Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 801.258 is amended to read:
801.258. [“Electric assisted bicycle” means a vehicle that: ]
[(1) Is designed to be operated on the ground on wheels; ]
[(2) Has a seat or saddle for use of the rider; ]
[(3) Is designed to travel with not more than three wheels in contact with the ground; ]
[(4) Has both fully operative pedals for human propulsion and an electric motor; and ]
[(5) Is equipped with an electric motor that: ]
[(a) Has a power output of not more than 1,000 watts; and ]
[(b) Is incapable of propelling the vehicle at a speed  of greater than 20 miles per hour on level
ground.]
(1) “Class 1 electric assisted bicycle” means an electric assisted bicycle that:
(a) Provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling; and
(b) Ceases to provide assistance  when the bicycle reaches the speed of 20 miles per hour.
(2) “Class 2 electric assisted bicycle” means an electric assisted bicycle that:
(a) May be propelled by its motor without a rider pedaling; and
(b) Ceases to provide assistance once the bicycle reaches a speed of 20 miles per hour.
(3) “Class 3 electric assisted bicycle” means an electric assisted bicycle that:
(a) Provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling;
(b) Ceases to provide assistance  when the bicycle reaches the speed of 28 miles per hour;
and
(c) Is equipped with a speedometer.
(4) “Electric assisted bicycle”  means a bicycle that is equipped with an electric motor and
that is a Class 1 electric assisted bicycle, a Class 2 electric  assisted bicycle or a Class 3
electric assisted bicycle.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 801.150 is amended to read:
801.150. “Bicycle” means a vehicle that:
(1) Is designed to be operated on the ground on wheels;
(2) Has a seat or saddle for use of the rider;
(3) Is designed to travel with not more than three wheels in contact with the ground;
(4) Is propelled exclusively by human power; [ and]
Enrolled House Bill 4103 (HB 4103-A) Page 1
(5) Has every wheel more than 14 inches in diameter or two tandem wheels either of which  is
more than 14 inches in diameter[ .]; and
(6) Is equipped with pedals.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 807.020 is amended to read:
807.020. A person who  is granted a driving privilege by this section may exercise the driving
privilege described without violation of the requirements under ORS 807.010. A grant of  driving
privileges to operate a motor vehicle under this section is subject to  suspension and revocation the
same as other driving privileges granted under the vehicle code. This section is in  addition to any
exemptions from the vehicle code  under ORS 801.026. The following persons are granted the de-
scribed driving privileges:
(1) A person who is not a resident of  this state or who has been a resident of this state for less
than 30 days may operate a motor vehicle without an Oregon license or driver  permit if the person
holds a current out-of-state license  issued to the person. For the purpose of this subsection, a per-
son is a resident of this state if the person meets the residency requirements described in ORS
807.062. To qualify under this  subsection, the person must have the out-of-state license or driver
permit in the person’s possession. A person is not granted driving privileges under this subsection:
(a) If the person is under the minimum age required to be eligible for driving  privileges under
ORS 807.060;
(b) During a period of suspension or revocation by this state or any other jurisdiction  of driving
privileges or of the right to apply for a license or driver  permit issued by this state or any other
jurisdiction;  or
(c) That exceed the driving privileges  granted to the person by the out-of-state license or driver
permit.
(2) A person who is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States  or a member of the
commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric  Administration may operate a motor
vehicle without an Oregon license  or driver permit if the person is operating a motor vehicle in the
course of the person’s duties in  the Armed Forces or the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Ad-
ministration.
(3) A person without a  license or driver permit may operate a road roller or road machinery
that is not required to be registered under the laws of this state.
(4) A person without a license or driver permit may temporarily  operate, draw, move or propel
a farm tractor or implement of husbandry.
(5) A person  without a license or driver permit may operate a motor vehicle to demonstrate
driving ability during the course  of an examination administered under ORS 807.070 for the purpose
of qualifying for a license or driver  permit. This subsection only applies when an authorized exam-
iner is in a seat beside the driver of the motor vehicle.
(6) Driving privileges for snowmobiles are exclusively as provided in ORS 821.150.
(7) Driving privileges for  Class I all-terrain vehicles are exclusively as provided in ORS 821.170,
unless a  person is operating a Class I all-terrain vehicle on an all-terrain vehicle highway access
route that is designated by the Oregon Transportation Commission as open to all-terrain vehicles.
(8) Driving  privileges for Class III all-terrain vehicles are exclusively as provided in ORS
821.172, unless a person  is operating a Class III all-terrain vehicle on an all-terrain vehicle highway
access route that is designated by the commission as open to all-terrain vehicles.
(9) Driving privileges for Class IV all-terrain vehicles are exclusively as provided in  ORS
821.176, unless a person  is operating a Class IV all-terrain vehicle on an all-terrain vehicle highway
access route that is designated by the commission as open to all-terrain vehicles.
(10) A person without a license or driver permit may operate a golf cart  in accordance with an
ordinance adopted under ORS 810.070.
(11) The  spouse of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty or the
spouse of a member  of the commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Adminis-
tration who is accompanying the member on assignment in this state may operate a motor vehicle
Enrolled House Bill 4103 (HB 4103-A) Page 2
if the spouse has a current  out-of-state license or driver permit issued to the spouse by another state
in the spouse’s possession.
(12) A person who is a member of  the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty or a
member of the commissioned corps  of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration may
operate a motor vehicle if the person has a current  out-of-state license or driver permit in the
person’s possession that is issued to the person by the person’s state of  domicile or by the Armed
Forces of the United States in a foreign country. Driving privileges  described under this subsection
that are granted by the Armed Forces apply only for a period of  45 days from the time the person
returns to the United States.
(13) A person who does not hold a motorcycle endorsement may operate  a motorcycle if the
person is:
(a) Within an enclosed cab;
(b) Operating a vehicle designed to travel with three  wheels in contact with the ground at
speeds of less than 15 miles per hour; or
(c) Operating an autocycle.
[(14) A person may operate a bicycle that is not an electric  assisted bicycle without any grant of
driving privileges.]
[(15) A  person may operate an electric assisted bicycle without a driver license or driver permit if
the person is 16 years of age or older. ]
(14) Except as provided in subsection (15) of this section, a person may  operate a bicycle
without any grant of driving privileges.
(15) A person may operate the following without  any grant of driving privileges if the
person is 16 years of age or older:
(a) A Class 1 electric assisted bicycle;
(b) A Class 2 electric assisted bicycle; or
(c) A Class 3 electric assisted bicycle.
(16) A person may operate a motor assisted scooter without a driver license or driver permit if
the person is 16 years of age or older.
(17) A person who is not a resident of this state or who has  been a resident of this state for less
than 30 days may operate a motor vehicle without an Oregon license or driver  permit if the person
is at least 15 years of age and has in the person’s  possession a current out-of-state equivalent of a
Class C instruction driver permit issued to the person. For the purpose of this subsection, a  person
is a resident of this state if the person meets the residency requirements described in ORS  807.062.
A person operating a motor vehicle under authority of this subsection  has the same privileges and
is subject to the  same restrictions as a person operating under the authority of a Class C instruction
driver permit issued as provided in ORS 807.280.
(18) A  person may operate an electric personal assistive mobility device without any grant of
driving privileges if the person is 16 years of age or older.
Enrolled House Bill 4103 (HB 4103-A) Page 3
Passed by House February 27, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4103 (HB 4103-A) Page 4